Hawaii statutes.
B. School
Impact Fees

Note

Subpart heading amended by L 2010, c 188, §3.

Implementation procedures; annual reports to legislature. L
2007, c 245, §§4, 6.

Revision Note

Sections 302A-1601 to 1611, enacted as a new part, are
redesignated as a subpart pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Building permit requirements for new developments in school
impact districts, see §46-142.5.

Impact fees for public highways, see §§264-121 to 127.

§302A-1601 Findings. New residential
developments within identified school impact districts create additional demand
for public school facilities. As such, once school impact districts are
identified, new residential developments shall be required to contribute toward
the construction of new or expansion of existing public school facilities
through:

(1) The land requirement, either through an in lieu
fee or actual acreage (unless land is not required in the school impact
district), based on each new residential development's proportionate share of
the need to provide additional public school sites; and

(2) The construction requirement either through an in
lieu fee or actual construction based on each new residential development's
proportionate share of the need to construct additional school facilities.

A study commissioned by the State has identified the
land dedication requirement that is consistent with proportionate fair-share
principles and the net capital cost of school facilities, excluding land costs,
that is consistent with proportionate fair-share principles.

The State determines that new residential
developments within designated school impact districts shall provide land for
schools or pay a fee in lieu of land proportionate to the impacts of the new
residential development on existing school facilities. The State also
determines that new residential developments within designated school impact
districts shall also pay school construction cost component impact fees
proportionate to their impacts.

In determining the amounts of land component
impact fees and construction cost component impact fees, the intent of the
school impact fee calculations is that new residential developments should not
be charged for a higher level of service than is being charged to existing
developments.

This subpart establishes the methodology for
developers to provide their proportionate share of the land and the
construction cost of new or expanded school facilities needed to serve new
residential developments, as determined in sections 302A-1606 and 302A-1607,
respectively. [L 2007, c 245, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 188, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next